Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1320
Intimidating pickets; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of intimidating pickets if he intimidates or attempts to intimidate any striker by threat of the loss of any right or condition of employment, that directly or indirectly would affect the lawful conduct of said striker in any way.

(2) Intimidation of pickets is a Class III misdemeanor. Each violation shall constitute a separate offense.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 304.